Hawaii statutes.
§667-3 Proceeds, how
applied. Mortgage and other creditors shall be entitled to payment
according to the priority of their liens, and not pro rata; and judgments of
foreclosure that are conducted in compliance with this part shall operate to
extinguish the liens of subsequent mortgages and liens of the same property,
without forcing prior mortgagees or lienors to their right of recovery. The
surplus after payment of the mortgage foreclosed, shall be applied pro tanto to
the next junior mortgage or lien, and so on to the payment, wholly or in part,
of mortgages and liens junior to the one assessed. [CC 1859, §1233; RL 1925,
§2889; RL 1935, §4722; RL 1945, §12422; RL 1955, §336-3; HRS §667-3; am L 1972,
c 90, §9(c); am L 2011, c 48, §16; am L 2012, c 182, §12]

Rules of Court

See HRCP rule 13.

Case Notes

Mortgagee of recorded chattel mortgage taking possession of
unharvested rice crop has prior right over subsequent creditors. 9 H. 616
(1895).

Tender must include attorney's fee in order to ward off
foreclosure when mortgage provides for attorney's fee. 21 H. 470 (1913); 29 H.
20 (1926).

Under HRCP rule 54(b), court has discretion to leave
adjudication of junior lien status for later determination. 56 H. 587, 545
P.2d 1173 (1976).

First mortgage lien should not have been terminated by
confirmation of sale unless first mortgagee's priority as to proceeds was
preserved. 67 H. 322, 687 P.2d 1333 (1984).

See 33 H. 1 (1934); 35 H. 482 (1940).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next